Missouri, session 2026, HB3087.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 262, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 262.975, to read as follows:
262.975. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for the purposes
2 of chapter 89, Helianthus annuus or any variety of Helianthus annuus shall not be
3 considered an agricultural crop.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.